Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1384.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 237.163, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Small wireless facility permits; general. (a) A local government unit: (1) may require a telecommunications right-of-way user to obtain a permit or permits under this section to place a new wireless support structure or collocate a small wireless facility in a public right-of-way managed by the local government unit; (2) must not require an applicant for a small wireless facility permit to provide any information that: (i) has previously been provided to the local government unit by the applicant in an application for a small wireless permit, which specific reference shall be provided to the local government unit by the applicant; and (ii) is not reasonably necessary to review a permit application for compliance with generally applicable and reasonable health, safety, and welfare regulations, and to demonstrate compliance with applicable Federal Communications Commission regulations governing radio frequency exposure, or other information required by this section; (3) must ensure that any application for a small wireless facility permit is processed on a nondiscriminatory basis; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) must specify that the term of a small wireless facility permit is equal to the length of time that the small wireless facility is in use, unless the permit is revoked under this sectiondeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) must require a telecommunications right-of-way user to provide notice to property owners located within a 300-foot radius from a new wireless support structure or small wireless facility before installing the new wireless support structure or small wireless facility in a public right-of-way managed by the local government unit. The notice required under this clause must: new text end new text begin (i) be provided by the telecommunications right-of-way user to all property owners receiving the notice (A) for permits issued before the effective date of this section, no later than seven days after the effective date of this section, and (B) for permits pending or submitted on or after the effective date of this section, no later than seven days after the date a permit has been applied for or submitted; and new text end new text begin (ii) include in plain English in at least 12-point font the proposed address of the new wireless support structure or small wireless facility, the name and contact information for the telecommunications right-of-way user proposing to obtain the permit or permits, and any other information, including a proposed timeline, relative to the proposed project. The notice must include, in a conspicuous place and in bold print, "NOTICE OF 5G TOWER CONSTRUCTION" and must be developed in a manner that the notice is not mistaken for unsolicited mail or marketing material. new text end (b) An applicant may file a consolidated permit application to collocate up to 15 small wireless facilities, or a greater number if agreed to by a local government unit, provided that all the small wireless facilities in the application: (1) are located within a two-mile radius; (2) consist of substantially similar equipment; and (3) are to be placed on similar types of wireless support structures. In rendering a decision on a consolidated permit application, a local government unit may approve a permit for some small wireless facilities and deny a permit for others, but may not use denial of one or more permits as a basis to deny all the small wireless facilities in the application. (c) If a local government unit receives applications within a single seven-day period from one or more applicants seeking approval of permits for more than 30 small wireless facilities, the local government unit may extend the 90-day deadline imposed in subdivision 3c by an additional 30 days. If a local government unit elects to invoke this extension, it must inform in writing any applicant to whom the extension will be applied. (d) A local government unit is prohibited from requiring a person to pay a small wireless facility permit fee, obtain a small wireless facility permit, or enter into a small wireless facility collocation agreement solely in order to conduct any of the following activities: (1) routine maintenance of a small wireless facility; (2) replacement of a small wireless facility with a new facility that is substantially similar or smaller in size, weight, height, and wind or structural loading than the small wireless facility being replaced; or (3) installation, placement, maintenance, operation, or replacement of micro wireless facilities that are suspended on cables strung between existing utility poles in compliance with national safety codes. A local government unit may require advance notification of these activities if the work will obstruct a public right-of-way. (e) Nothing in this subdivision affects the need for an entity seeking to place a small wireless facility on a wireless support structure that is not owned by a local government unit to obtain from the owner of the wireless support structure any necessary authority to place the small wireless facility, nor shall any provision of this chapter be deemed to affect the rates, terms, and conditions for access to or placement of a small wireless facility or a wireless support structure not owned by a local government unit. This subdivision does not affect any existing agreement between a local government unit and an entity concerning the placement of small wireless facilities on local government unit-owned wireless support structures. (f) No later than six months after May 31, 2017, or three months after receiving a small wireless facility permit application from a wireless service provider, a local government unit that has elected to set forth terms and conditions of collocation in a standard small wireless facility collocation agreement shall develop and make available an agreement that complies with the requirements of this section and section 237.162. A standard small wireless facility collocation agreement shall be substantially complete. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the parties to a small wireless facility collocation agreement may incorporate additional terms and conditions mutually agreed upon into a small wireless facility collocation agreement. A small wireless facility collocation agreement between a local government unit and a wireless service provider is considered public data not on individuals and is accessible to the public under section 13.03. (g) An approval of a small wireless facility permit under this section authorizes the installation, placement, maintenance, or operation of a small wireless facility to provide wireless service and shall not be construed to confer authorization to (1) provide any service other than a wireless service, or (2) install, place, maintain, or operate a wireline backhaul facility in the right-of-way. (h) The terms and conditions of collocation under this subdivision: (1) may be set forth in a small wireless facility collocation agreement, if a local government unit elects to utilize such an agreement; (2) must be nondiscriminatory, competitively neutral, and commercially reasonable; and (3) must comply with this section and section 237.162. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 237.163, subdivision 3b, is amended to read: Subd. 3b. Small wireless facility permits; placement. (a) A local government unit may not require the placement of small wireless facilities on any specific wireless support structure other than the wireless support structure proposed in the permit application. (b) A local government unit deleted text begin must notdeleted text end new text begin maynew text end limit the placement of small wireless facilitiesdeleted text begin , either by minimum separation distances between small wireless facilities or maximum height limitations, except that eachdeleted text end new text begin as follows:new text end new text begin (1) anew text end wireless support structure installed in the right-of-way after May 31, 2017, shall not exceed 50 feet above ground level, unless the local government unit agrees to a greater height, subject to local zoning regulationsdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and deleted text begin may bedeleted text end new text begin (2) a wireless support structure isnew text end subject to separationnew text begin and setbacknew text end requirements deleted text begin in relation todeleted text end new text begin under local zoning regulations governing residential dwellings, schools, day care facilities, buildings that house vulnerable populations, ornew text end other wireless support structures.new text begin If a local zoning regulation does not specify small wireless facility setback requirements, the setback and separation requirements are:new text end new text begin (i) for a setback from dwellings regardless of zone, small wireless facilities must not be within 300 feet of a lawful dwelling unit; and new text end new text begin (ii) for facility separation, a facility must not be located within 1,500 feet of another facility. new text end (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), a wireless support structure that replaces an existing wireless support structure that is higher than 50 feet above ground level may be placed at the height of the existing wireless support structure, unless the local government unit agrees to a greater height, subject to local zoning regulations. (d) Wireless facilities constructed in the right-of-way after May 31, 2017, may not extend more than ten feet above an existing wireless support structure in place as of May 31, 2017. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end